California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) The department shall implement an expedited application process to determine the Medi-Cal eligibility under this section for individuals who, based on excess income, are denied eligibility for the SSI/SSP program by the Social Security
 Administration. The department shall use its best efforts to identify these individuals from information provided by the Social Security Administration. The department shall also allow these individuals to self-identify by producing a copy of the notice of action that they received from the Social Security Administration informing them that their application for eligibility for the SSI/SSP program was denied based on excess income.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction without taking regulatory action.

(g) This section shall cease to be implemented when the SSI/SSP program payment levels increase beyond those in effect on May 1, 2009.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be read as entitling any individual to Medi-Cal benefits before his or her Medi-Cal eligibility determination has been completed.

(i) This section shall not change the procedures for redetermining a beneficiary’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits.

(j) The department shall seek any approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services necessary to obtain federal financial participation and to expeditiously implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 31.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.

(a) This section applies to medically needy persons, medically needy family persons, and state-only Medi-Cal persons.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “principal residence” means the home, including a multiple-dwelling unit, in which the individual resides or formerly resided. The home will continue to be considered the principal residence if any of the following is applicable:

(1) During any absence, the individual intends to return to the home.

(2) The individual lives in a nursing facility or a medical institution and intends to return home.

(3) The
 individual’s spouse or a dependent relative of the individual continues to reside in the home during the individual’s absence.

(4) The individual does not have the right, authority, power, or legal capacity to liquidate the property, but a bona fide effort is being made to attain the right, authority, power, or legal capacity to liquidate the property.

(5) The property cannot readily be converted to cash but a bona fide effort is being made to sell the property, in which case the state shall, subject to notice and an opportunity for a hearing, have a lien against the property, to the extent permitted by federal law, for the cost of medical services.

The lien shall be recorded, and from the date of recording, shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.

(6) If it is a multiple-dwelling unit, one unit of which is occupied by the applicant or recipient, any unit not occupied by the applicant or recipient is producing income for the individual or family reasonably consistent with its value.

(7) It is inhabited by any sibling or child of the recipient who has continuously resided in the property since at least one year prior to the date the owner entered a nursing facility, or in a medical institution.

For purposes of this subdivision, “bona fide effort” means that the property shall be listed with a licensed real estate broker at the value determined to be the fair market value by a qualified real estate appraiser and the applicant or recipient provides evidence that a continuous effort is being made to sell the property, offers at fair market value are accepted, and all offers are reported.

(c) For purposes of determining eligibility under this part, countable resources shall be determined in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62. Resources exempt under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) shall not be considered in determining eligibility. A community spouse may retain nonexempt resources to the maximum extent permitted under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). Medically needy individuals and families may retain nonexempt resources to the extent permitted under
 Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). In addition, the principal residence as defined in subdivision (b) shall be exempt.

(d) The director, to meet the requirements of the federal Social Security Act and to ensure the highest percentage of federal financial participation in the program provided by this chapter, may decrease or increase the amounts set forth herein.

(e) (1) If the holdings are in the form of real property, the value shall be the assessed value, determined under the most recent county property tax assessment, less the unpaid amount of any encumbrance of record.

(2) If the real property other than the home is not producing income reasonably consistent with its value, the applicant or recipient shall be allowed reasonable time to begin producing
 such income from the property. If the property cannot produce reasonable income or be sold based on the market value, the applicant or recipient shall be allowed to submit evidence from a qualified real estate appraiser that indicates the value for which the property can be adequately utilized or sold. If the applicant or recipient provides evidence that the only method of adequately utilizing the property is sale, and the property has not been sold at market value during a reasonable period of time, the property shall be considered to be adequately utilized provided it is listed with a licensed real estate broker at the value determined to be the fair market value by a qualified real estate appraiser and the applicant or recipient provides evidence that a bona fide and continuous effort is being made to sell the property.

(3) If federal requirements permit a person to whom this subdivision applies to own an automobile of greater value than is
 permitted in determining eligibility for aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), the department shall adopt regulations authorizing that higher allowance.

(f) Any mortgage or note secured by a deed of trust shall be deemed real property if its value does not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) and it is obtained by the applicant or recipient, or in combination with their spouse, through the sale of such real property.

(g) If the holdings consist of money on deposit, the value shall be the actual amount thereof. If the holdings are in any other form of personal property or investment, except life insurance, the value shall be the conversion value as of the date of application or the anniversary date of such application. If the holdings are in the form of life insurance, the value shall be the cash value as of the policy anniversary nearest the date of such
 application.

(h) The value of property holdings shall be determined as of the date of application and, if the person is found eligible, this determination shall establish the amount of such holdings to be considered during the ensuing 12 months except a new determination to govern during the succeeding 12 months shall be made on the first anniversary date of the application or such alternate date as may be established following the acquisition of additional holdings as provided in the following paragraph and on each succeeding anniversary date thereafter.

(i) If any person shall by gift, inheritance, or other manner, acquire additional holdings during any such interval, other than from their own earnings, they shall immediately report such acquisition, and the anniversary date shall become the date of such acquisition.

(j) If any provision of this section does not comply with federal requirements, the provision shall become inoperative to the extent that it is not in compliance with federal requirements pursuant to Section 11003.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 62.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.01.

(a) This section applies to any individual who is residing in a continuing care retirement community, as defined in paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 1771 of the Health and Safety Code, pursuant to a continuing care contract, as defined in paragraph (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 1771 of the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to a life care contract, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 1771 of the Health and Safety Code, that collects an entrance fee from its residents upon admission.

(b) In determining an individual’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, the individual’s entrance fee shall be considered a resource available to the individual if all of the following apply:

(1) The individual has the ability to use the entrance fee, or the contract provides that the entrance fee may be used, to pay for care if other resources or income of the individual are insufficient to pay for care.

(2) The individual is eligible for a refund of any remaining entrance fee when they die or terminate their contract with, and leave, the continuing care retirement community.

(3) The entrance fee does not confer an ownership interest in the continuing care retirement community.

(c) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent required by federal law, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is
 available.

(d) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 63.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.15.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “equity interest” means the lesser of the following:

(1) The assessed value of the principal residence determined under the most recent tax assessment, less any encumbrances of record.

(2) The appraised value of the principal residence determined by a qualified real estate appraiser who has been retained by the applicant or beneficiary, less any encumbrances of record.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 14006, and except as provided in subdivision (c), an individual is not eligible for medical assistance for home and facility care if their equity interest in the principal
 residence exceeds seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000). No later than December 31, 2011, and each year thereafter, this amount shall be increased based on the percentage increase in the consumer price index for all urban consumers (all items, United States city average), rounded to the nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) This section does not apply to an individual if any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The spouse of the individual or the individual’s child, who is under 21 years of age, or who is blind or who is disabled, as defined in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 1382c of Title 42 of the United States Code, is lawfully residing in the individual’s home.

(2) The individual was determined eligible for medical assistance for home and facility care based on an application filed
 before January 1, 2006.

(3) The department determines that ineligibility for medical assistance for home and facility care would result in demonstrated hardship on the individual. For purposes of this section, demonstrated hardship shall include, but need not be limited to, any of the following circumstances:

(A) The individual was receiving home and facility care prior to January 1, 2006.

(B) The individual has been determined to be eligible for medical assistance for home and facility care based on an application filed on or after January 1, 2006, and before the date that regulations adopted pursuant to this section are certified with the Secretary of State.

(C) The individual purchased and received benefits under a long-term care insurance policy
 certified by the department’s California Partnership for Long-Term Care Program, established by Division 12 (commencing with Section 22000).

(D) The individual’s equity interest in the principal residence exceeds the equity interest limit as provided in subdivision (b), but would not exceed the equity interest limit under that subdivision if it had been increased by using the quarterly House Price Index (HPI) for California, published by the Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight (OFHEO).

(E) The applicant or beneficiary has been denied a home equity loan by at least three lending institutions, or is ineligible for any one Federal Housing Administration (FHA) approved loan or reverse mortgage.

(F) The applicant or beneficiary, with good cause, is unable to provide verification of the equity value.

(G) The applicant or beneficiary meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14015.1.

(d) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act,
 and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(e) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 65.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.2.

(a) In determining the eligibility of a married individual, pursuant to Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, who, in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, is considered to be living separately from their spouse, the individual shall be considered to have made a transfer of resources for full and adequate consideration under Section 14006 or 14015 by reason of either of the following:

(1) Having entered into a written agreement with their spouse dividing their nonexempt community property into equal shares of separate property. Property so agreed to be separate property shall be considered by the department to be the separate property of the spouse who, pursuant to the
 agreement, is the owner of the property. Only in cases in which separate property owned by one spouse is actually made available to the other spouse, may the department count the separate property in the eligibility determination of the nonowner spouse.

(2) Having transferred to their spouse all of their interest in a home, whether the transfer was made before or after the individual became a resident in a nursing facility in accordance with and to the extent permitted by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

(b) The department shall furnish to all Medi-Cal applicants a clear and simple statement in writing advising them that (1) in the case of an individual who is an inpatient in a nursing facility, if the individual or the individual’s conservator transferred to the individual’s spouse all of the interest in a home, the
 individual shall not be considered ineligible for Medi-Cal by reason of the transfer; and that (2) if the individual and the individual’s spouse execute a written interspousal agreement that divides and transmutes nonexempt community property into equal shares of separate property, the separate property of the individual’s spouse shall not be considered available to the individual and need not be spent by the spouse for the individual’s care in a nursing facility or other medical institution. The statement provided for in this subdivision shall also be furnished to each individual admitted to a nursing facility, along with, but separately from, the statement required under Section 72527 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) In order to qualify for Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, a married individual who resides in a nursing facility, and who is in a Medi-Cal budget unit separate from that of their
 spouse, shall be required to expend their other resources for their own benefit, so that the amount that remains does not exceed the
 maximum levels established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62. In the event that the married individual expends their resources for expenses associated with or for improvements to property, those expenditures shall be considered to be for their own benefit only to the extent that the expenditures are proportionate to the ownership interest the individual has in the property. For purposes of this section, the term “their other resources” shall be limited to the following:

(1) All of their separate property that would not have been exempt under applicable Medi-Cal laws and regulations at the time when they entered a nursing facility, or at the date of execution of the agreement referred to in this section, whichever is earlier. For purposes of this paragraph, the mere change of residence from one facility to another shall not be deemed to be a new entry.

(2) One-half of all the community property, or the proceeds from the sale or exchange of that property, that would not have been exempt at the time described in paragraph (1).

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), in the absence of an agreement such as that referred to in subdivision (a), there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by either spouse, that all property owned by either spouse was community property.

(e) The statement furnished pursuant to subdivision (b) shall advise all persons entering a long-term care facility, and all Medi-Cal applicants that only their half of the community property shall be taken into account in determining their eligibility for Medi-Cal, whether or not they execute the written interspousal agreement referred to in the statement.

(f) This section shall not apply to an institutionalized spouse.

(g) This section shall apply to the full extent to an institutionalized spouse if Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is amended to authorize the consideration of state community property law in determining eligibility under this chapter, or the federal government authorizes the state to apply community property laws in making that determination.

(h) (1) Subdivision (f) shall become inoperative if the federal government amends Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) to allow state community property laws to be considered for Medi-Cal eligibility purposes, or the federal government authorizes the state to apply community property laws in making that determination.

(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature upon the occurrence of the amendment of federal law or receipt of federal authorization as specified in paragraph (1).

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 66.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.3.

(a) The department, at the time of application or the assessment pursuant to Section 14006.6, and any nursing facility enrolled as a provider in the Medi-Cal program, before admitting any person, shall provide a clear and simple statement, in writing, in a form and language specified by the department, to that person, and that person’s spouse, legal representative, or agent, if any, that explains the resource and income requirements of the Medi-Cal program, including, but not limited to, certain exempt resources, certain protections against spousal impoverishment, and certain circumstances under which an interest in a home may
 be transferred without affecting Medi-Cal eligibility.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 92) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 67.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.3.

(a) The department, at the time of application or the assessment pursuant to former Section 14006.6, and any nursing facility enrolled as a provider in the Medi-Cal program, before admitting any person, shall provide a clear and simple statement, in writing, in a form and language specified by the department, to that person, and that person’s spouse, legal representative, or agent, if any, that explains the income requirements of the Medi-Cal program, including, but not limited to, certain protections against spousal impoverishment.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 93) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 68.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 67 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.4.

(a) The statement required by Sections 14006.2 and 14006.3 shall be in the following form:

“NOTICE REGARDING STANDARDS FOR MEDI-CAL ELIGIBILITY

If you or your spouse is in or is entering a nursing facility, read this important message!

You or your spouse do not have to use all your resources, such as savings, before Medi-Cal might help pay for all or some of the costs of a nursing facility.

You should be aware of the following to take advantage of these provisions of the law:

UNMARRIED RESIDENT

An unmarried resident is financially eligible for Medi-Cal
 benefits if they have less than (insert amount of individual’s resource allowance) in available resources. A home is an exempt resource and is not considered against the resource limit, as long as the resident states on the Medi-Cal application that they intend to return home. Clothes, household furnishings, irrevocable burial plans, burial plots, and an automobile are examples of other exempt resources.

If an unmarried resident is financially eligible for Medi-Cal reimbursement, they are allowed to keep from their monthly income a personal allowance of (insert amount of personal needs allowance) plus the amount of health insurance premiums paid monthly. The remainder of the monthly income is paid to the nursing facility as a monthly deductible called the “Medi-Cal long-term care patient liability.”

MARRIED RESIDENT

If one spouse lives in a nursing facility, and the other
 spouse does not live in a nursing facility, the Medi-Cal program will pay some or all of the nursing facility costs as long as the couple together does not have more than (insert amount of Community Spouse Resource Allowance plus individual’s resource allowance) in available assets. The couple’s home will not be counted against this (insert amount of Community Spouse Resource Allowance plus individual’s resource allowance), as long as one spouse or a dependent relative, or both, lives in the home, or the spouse in the nursing facility states on the Medi-Cal application that they intend to return to the couple’s home to live.

If a spouse is eligible for Medi-Cal payment of nursing facility costs, the spouse living at home is allowed to keep a monthly income of at least their individual monthly income or (insert amount of Minimum Monthly Maintenance Needs Allowance), whichever is greater. Of the couple’s remaining monthly income, the spouse in the nursing facility is
 allowed to keep a personal allowance of (insert amount of personal needs allowance) plus the amount of health insurance premiums paid monthly. The remaining money, if any, generally must be paid to the nursing facility as the Medi-Cal long-term care patient liability. The Medi-Cal program will pay remaining nursing facility costs.

Under certain circumstances, an at-home spouse can obtain an order from an administrative law judge that will allow the at-home spouse to retain additional resources or income. Such an order can allow the couple to retain more than (insert amount of Community Spouse Resource Allowance plus individual’s resource allowance) in available resources, if the income that could be generated by the retained resources would not cause the total monthly income available to the at-home spouse to exceed (insert amount of Monthly Maintenance Needs Allowance). Such an order also can allow the at-home spouse to retain more than (insert amount of Monthly
 Maintenance Needs Allowance) in monthly income, if the extra income is necessary “due to exceptional circumstances resulting in significant financial duress.”

An at-home spouse also may obtain a court order to increase the amount of income and resources that they are allowed to retain, or to transfer property from the spouse in the nursing facility to the at-home spouse. You should contact a knowledgeable attorney for further information regarding court orders.

The paragraphs above do not apply if both spouses live in a nursing facility and neither previously has been granted Medi-Cal eligibility. In this situation, the spouses may be able to hasten Medi-Cal eligibility by entering into an agreement that divides their community property. The advice of a knowledgeable attorney should be obtained prior to the signing of this type of agreement.

Note: For married couples, the resource
 limit ((insert amount of Community Spouse Resource Allowance plus individual’s resource allowance) in (insert current year)) and income limit ((insert amount of Minimum Monthly Maintenance Needs Allowance) in (insert current year)) generally increase a slight amount on January 1 of every year.

TRANSFER OF HOME FOR BOTH A MARRIED AND AN UNMARRIED RESIDENT

A transfer of a property interest in a resident’s home will not cause ineligibility for Medi-Cal reimbursement if either of the following conditions is met:

(a) At the time of transfer, the recipient of the property interest states in writing that the resident would have been allowed to return to the home at the time of the transfer, if the resident’s medical condition allowed them to leave the nursing facility. This provision shall only apply if the home has been considered an exempt resource because
 of the resident’s intent to return home.

(b) The home is transferred to one of the following individuals:

(1) The resident’s spouse.

(2) The resident’s minor or disabled child.

(3) A sibling of the resident who has an equity interest in the home, and who resided in the resident’s home for at least one year immediately before the resident began living in institutions.

(4) A child of the resident who resided in the resident’s home at least two years before the resident began living in institutions, and who provided care to the resident that permitted the resident to remain at home longer.

This is only a brief description of the Medi-Cal eligibility
 rules, for more detailed information, you should call your county welfare department. You will probably want to consult with the local branch of the state long-term care ombudsman, an attorney, or a legal services program for seniors in your area.

I have read the above notice and have received a copy.Dated: ______ Signature: _________”

(c) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall be printed in at least 10-point type, shall be clearly separate from any other document or writing, and shall be signed by the person to be admitted
 and that person’s spouse, and legal representative, if any.

(d) Any nursing facility that willfully fails to comply with this section shall be subject to a class “B” citation, as defined by Section 1424 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) The department may revise this statement as necessary to maintain its consistency with state and
 federal law.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 94) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 69.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.4.

(a) The statement required by Section 14006.3 shall be in the following form:

“NOTICE REGARDING STANDARDS FOR MEDI-CAL ELIGIBILITY

If you or your spouse is in or is entering a nursing facility, read this important message!

You or your spouse do not have to use all your resources, such as savings, before Medi-Cal might help pay for all or some of the costs of a nursing facility.

You should be aware of the following to take advantage of these provisions of the law:

UNMARRIED RESIDENT

An unmarried resident is financially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits if
 they meet income requirements. Resources, including property and assets, are not considered in determining Medi-Cal eligibility.

If an unmarried resident is financially eligible for Medi-Cal reimbursement, they are allowed to keep from their monthly income a personal allowance of (insert amount of personal needs allowance) plus the amount of health insurance premiums paid monthly. The remainder of the monthly income is paid to the nursing facility as a monthly deductible called the “Medi-Cal share of cost.”

MARRIED RESIDENT

If one spouse lives in a nursing facility, and the other spouse does not live in a nursing facility, the Medi-Cal program will pay some or all of the nursing facility costs as long as the couple together meets income requirements. Resources, including property and assets, are not considered in determining Medi-Cal eligibility.

If a spouse is eligible for Medi-Cal payment of nursing facility costs, the spouse living at home is allowed to keep a monthly income of at least their individual monthly income or (insert amount of Minimum Monthly Maintenance Needs Allowance), whichever is greater. Of the couple’s remaining monthly income, the spouse in the nursing facility is allowed to keep a personal allowance of (insert amount of personal needs allowance) plus the amount of health insurance premiums paid monthly. The remaining money, if any, generally must be paid to the nursing facility as the Medi-Cal share of cost. The Medi-Cal program will pay remaining nursing facility costs.

Under certain circumstances, an at-home spouse can obtain an order from an administrative law judge that will allow the at-home spouse to retain additional income. That order may allow the at-home spouse to retain more than (insert amount of Monthly Maintenance Needs Allowance)
 in monthly income, if the extra income is necessary “due to exceptional circumstances resulting in significant financial duress.”

An at-home spouse also may obtain a court order to increase the amount of income that they are allowed to retain. You should contact a knowledgeable attorney for further information regarding court orders.

Note: For married couples, the income limit ((insert amount of Minimum Monthly Maintenance Needs Allowance) in (insert current year)) generally increase a slight amount on January 1 of every year.

This is only a brief description of the Medi-Cal eligibility rules, for more detailed information, you should call your county welfare department. You will probably want to consult with the local branch of the state long-term care ombudsman, an attorney, or a legal services program for seniors in your area.

I
 have read the above notice and have received a copy.Dated: ______ Signature: _________”

(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall be printed in at least 10-point type, shall be clearly separate from any other document or writing, and shall be signed by the person to be admitted and that person’s spouse, and legal representative, if any.

(c) Any nursing facility that willfully fails to comply with this section shall be subject to a class “B” citation, as defined by Section 1424 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The department may revise this statement as necessary to maintain its consistency with state and federal law.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 95) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 70.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 69 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.41.

(a) To be eligible for medical assistance for home and facility care, an individual shall disclose at the time of the individual’s application or redetermination a description of any interest that he or she or his or her spouse has in an annuity, which is known to the individual or his or her spouse, regardless of whether the annuity is irrevocable or is treated as income or as a resource.

(b) At the time of the individual’s application or redetermination, the department shall
 inform the individual and his or her spouse that, by virtue of its provision of medical assistance for home and facility care to the individual, the state will, by operation of law, become a remainder beneficiary of certain annuities, as described in Section 14009.6.

(c) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(d) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(e) It is
 the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 379, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.5.

(a) The department shall include training regarding the treatment of separate and community income and resources in determining eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, as part of the ongoing training offered to county welfare departments.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2026, the department shall also include training regarding the applicability of the lookback period outlined in Section 14015, which only applies to people seeking home- and facility-based care as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1396p of Title 42 of the United States Code, as part of the
 ongoing training offered to county welfare departments.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 96) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 71.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.5.

(a) The department shall include training on the treatment of separate and community income in determining eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, as part of the ongoing training offered to county welfare departments.

(b) This section shall become operative on the later of either January 1, 2024, or the date on which the determination of the Director of Health Care Services is communicated in writing to the Department of Finance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.62, and subject to implementation of Section 14005.62 pursuant to subdivision (d) of that section, and shall remain operative for time periods in which the department has obtained the necessary federal approvals to implement paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of
 Section 14005.62 for the applicable population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 97.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   See same-numbered section amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.6.

(a) To the extent required by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, upon the request of either an institutionalized spouse or a community spouse, and upon receipt of relevant documentation of resources, the department shall promptly assess and document the total value of the couple’s resources to the extent either the institutionalized spouse or the community spouse has an ownership interest. Upon completion of the assessment and documentation, the department shall provide a copy of such assessment and documentation to each spouse and shall retain a copy of the assessment.

(b) If the assessment is not part of an application for Medi-Cal, the department may, as a condition of
 providing the assessment, require payment of a fee not to exceed the reasonable expenses of providing and documenting the assessment.

(c) For purposes of completing the assessment, resources shall be determined, defined, counted, and valued in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 14006, and subject to the maximum resource levels specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62.

(d) At the time of providing the copy of the assessment to the couple, the department shall include a notice indicating that either spouse will have a right to a fair hearing to the extent required by federal law.

(e) (1) This section shall remain operative only until Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is amended to authorize the consideration of state community property law in determining eligibility under this chapter, or the federal government authorizes the state to apply community property laws in making that determination.

(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature upon the occurrence of the amendment of federal law or the receipt of federal authorization to apply community property law, as specified in paragraph (1).

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 72.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.7.
